Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.915

Effective date—2020 c 312; 2019 c 437.

This act takes effect January 1, 2022, except that:

(1) Section 129, chapter 437, Laws of 2019 takes effect on June 11, 2020; and

(2) With respect to minors, sections 101 through 128, 130 through 136, 201 through 216, 602, 802, 803, and 805, chapter 437, Laws of 2019 take effect January 1, 2021.

[ 2020 c 312 s 902; 2019 c 437 s 807.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: "(1) Except for sections 101 through 122, 301 through 307, 312, 313, 725, 801, 902, 903, 905, and 906 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

(2) Sections 101 through 122, 301 through 307, 312, 313, 725, 801, 905, and 906 of this act take effect January 1, 2021." [ 2020 c 312 s 907.]